src/main/resources/Stemmer.sbl
'o{sx}e'
(<-'o{sx}')
'evitijima'
'evitijega'
'evitijemu'
'evitijem'
'evitega'
'evitemu'
'evitem'
'evitijim'
'evitijih'
'evitijoj'
'evitijeg'
'evitiji'
'evitije'
'evitija'
'evitoga'
'evitome'
'evitomu'
'evitima'
'evitog'
'evitom'
'evitim'
'evitih'
'evitoj'
'eviti'
'evite'
'evito'
'evita'
'evitu'
(<-'evit')
'ovitijima'
'ovitijega'
'ovitijemu'
'ovitijem'
'ovitega'
'ovitemu'
'ovitem'
'ovitijim'
'ovitijih'
'ovitijoj'
'ovitijeg'
'ovitiji'
'ovitije'
'ovitija'
'ovitoga'
'ovitome'
'ovitomu'
'ovitima'
'ovitog'
'ovitom'
'ovitim'
'ovitih'
'ovitoj'
'oviti'
'ovite'
'ovito'
'ovita'
'ovitu'
(<-'ovit')
'astijima'
'astijega'
'astijemu'
'astijem'
'astega'
'astemu'
'astem'
'astijim'
'astijih'
'astijoj'
'astijeg'
'astiji'
'astije'
'astija'
'astoga'
'astome'
'astomu'
'astima'
'astog'
'astom'
'astim'
'astih'
'astoj'
'asti'
'aste'
'asto'
'asta'
'astu'
(<-'ast')
'kijemu'
'kijima'
'kijega'
'kijeg'
'kijem'
'kemu'
'kega'
'keg'
'kem'
'kijim'
'kijih'
'kijoj'
'koga'
'kome'
'komu'
'kima'
'kiji'
'kije'
'kija'
'kiju'
'kim'
'kih'
'koj'
'kom'
'kog'
'ki'
'ka'
'ku'
'ke'
'ko'
(<-'k')
'evaju{cy}i'
'evasmo'
'evaste'
'evajmo'
'evajte'
'evaju'
'evala'
'evale'
'evali'
'evalo'
'evamo'
'evana'
'evane'
'evani'
'evano'
'evate'
'evati'
'eva{sx}e'
'evahu'
'evah'
'evaj'
'evam'
'evan'
'evao'
'evat'
'evav'
'eva{sx}'
(<-'eva')
'avaju{cy}i'
'avasmo'
'avaste'
'avajmo'
'avajte'
'avaju'
'avala'
'avale'
'avali'
'avalo'
'avamo'
'avana'
'avane'
'avani'
'avano'
'avate'
'avati'
'ava{sx}e'
'avahu'
'avah'
'avaj'
'avam'
'avan'
'avao'
'avat'
'avav'
'ava{sx}'
(<-'ava')
'ivaju{cy}i'
'ivasmo'
'ivaste'
'ivajmo'
'ivajte'
'ivaju'
'ivala'
'ivale'
'ivali'
'ivalo'
'ivamo'
'ivana'
'ivane'
'ivani'
'ivano'
'ivate'
'ivati'
'iva{sx}e'
'ivahu'
'ivah'
'ivaj'
'ivam'
'ivan'
'ivao'
'ivat'
'ivav'
'iva{sx}'
(<-'iva')
'uvaju{cy}i'
'uvasmo'
'uvaste'
'uvajmo'
'uvajte'
'uvaju'
'uvala'
'uvale'
'uvali'
'uvalo'
'uvamo'
'uvana'
'uvane'
'uvani'
'uvano'
'uvate'
'uvati'
'uva{sx}e'
'uvahu'
'uvah'
'uvaj'
'uvam'
'uvan'
'uvao'
'uvat'
'uvav'
'uva{sx}'
(<-'uva')
'irujemo'
'irujete'
'iruju{cy}i'
'iraju{cy}i'
'irivat'
'irujem'
'iruje{sx}'
'irujmo'
'irujte'
'irav{sx}i'
'irasmo'
'iraste'
'irati'
'iramo'
'irate'
'iraju'
'ira{sx}e'
'irahu'
'irala'
'iralo'
'irali'
'irale'
'iruje'
'iruju'
'iruj'
'iral'
'iran'
'iram'
'ira{sx}'
'irat'
'irah'
'irao'
(<-'ir')
'a{cx}ismo'
'a{cx}iste'
'a{cx}iti'
'a{cx}imo'
'a{cx}ite'
'a{cx}i{sx}e'
'a{cx}e{cy}i'
'a{cx}ila'
'a{cx}ilo'
'a{cx}ili'
'a{cx}ile'
'a{cx}ena'
'a{cx}eno'
'a{cx}eni'
'a{cx}ene'
'a{cx}io'
'a{cx}im'
'a{cx}i{sx}'
'a{cx}it'
'a{cx}ih'
'a{cx}en'
'a{cx}i'
'a{cx}e'
(<-'a{cx}')
'a{cx}av{sx}i'
'a{cx}asmo'
'a{cx}aste'
'a{cx}ahu'
'a{cx}ati'
'a{cx}amo'
'a{cx}ate'
'a{cx}a{sx}e'
'a{cx}ala'
'a{cx}alo'
'a{cx}ali'
'a{cx}ale'
'a{cx}aju'
'a{cx}ana'
'a{cx}ano'
'a{cx}ani'
'a{cx}ane'
'a{cx}ao'
'a{cx}am'
'a{cx}a{sx}'
'a{cx}at'
'a{cx}ah'
'a{cx}an'
(<-'a{cx}a')
'nuv{sx}i'
'nusmo'
'nuste'
'nu{cy}i'
'nimo'
'nite'
'nemo'
'nete'
'nula'
'nulo'
'nule'
'nuli'
'nuto'
'nuti'
'nuta'
'ne{sx}'
'nuo'
'nut'
(<-'n')
'niv{sx}i'
'nismo'
'niste'
'niti'
'nila'
'nilo'
'nile'
'nili'
'ni{sx}'
'nio'
(<-'ni')
'aju{cy}i'
'av{sx}i'
'asmo'
'ajmo'
'ajte'
'ajem'
'amo'
'ate'
'aje'
'aju'
'ati'
'a{sx}e'
'ahu'
'ala'
'ali'
'ale'
'alo'
'ano'
'at'
'ah'
'ao'
'aj'
'an'
'am'
'a{sx}'
(<-'a')
'uraju{cy}i'
'urasmo'
'uraste'
'urajmo'
'urajte'
'uramo'
'urate'
'uraju'
'urati'
'ura{sx}e'
'urahu'
'urala'
'urali'
'urale'
'uralo'
'urana'
'urano'
'urani'
'urane'
'ural'
'urat'
'urah'
'urao'
'uraj'
'uran'
'uram'
'ura{sx}'
(<-'ur')
'astajasmo'
'astajaste'
'astajahu'
'astajati'
'astajemo'
'astajete'
'astaja{sx}e'
'astajali'
'astaju{cy}i'
'astajala'
'astajalo'
'astajale'
'astajmo'
'astajao'
'astajem'
'astaje{sx}'
'astajat'
'astajah'
'astajte'
'astaje'
'astaju'
(<-'astaj')
'istajasmo'
'istajaste'
'istajahu'
'istajati'
'istajemo'
'istajete'
'istaja{sx}e'
'istajali'
'istaju{cy}i'
'istajala'
'istajalo'
'istajale'
'istajmo'
'istajao'
'istajem'
'istaje{sx}'
'istajat'
'istajah'
'istajte'
'istaje'
'istaju'
(<-'istaj')
'ostajasmo'
'ostajaste'
'ostajahu'
'ostajati'
'ostajemo'
'ostajete'
'ostaja{sx}e'
'ostajali'
'ostaju{cy}i'
'ostajala'
'ostajalo'
'ostajale'
'ostajmo'
'ostajao'
'ostajem'
'ostaje{sx}'
'ostajat'
'ostajah'
'ostajte'
'ostaje'
'ostaju'
(<-'ostaj')
'alama'
'alima'
'alom'
'alu'
'al'
(<-'a')
'ajevima'
'ajevi'
'ajeva'
'ajeve'
'ajama'
'ajima'
'aja'
'aji'
(<-'aj')
'astadosmo'
'astadoste'
'astado{sx}e'
'astanemo'
'astademo'
'astanete'
'astadete'
'astanimo'
'astanite'
'astanila'
'astav{sx}i'
'astanem'
'astadem'
'astane{sx}'
'astade{sx}'
'astadoh'
'astade'
'astati'
'astane'
'astanu'
'astadu'
'astala'
'astali'
'astalo'
'astale'
'astat'
'astao'
(<-'asta')
'istadosmo'
'istadoste'
'istado{sx}e'
'istanemo'
'istademo'
'istanete'
'istadete'
'istanimo'
'istanite'
'istanila'
'istav{sx}i'
'istanem'
'istadem'
'istane{sx}'
'istade{sx}'
'istadoh'
'istade'
'istati'
'istane'
'istanu'
'istadu'
'istala'
'istali'
'istalo'
'istale'
'istat'
'istao'
(<-'ista')
'ostadosmo'
'ostadoste'
'ostado{sx}e'
'ostanemo'
'ostademo'
'ostanete'
'ostadete'
'ostanimo'
'ostanite'
'ostanila'
'ostav{sx}i'
'ostanem'
'ostadem'
'ostane{sx}'
'ostade{sx}'
'ostadoh'
'ostade'
'ostati'
'ostane'
'ostanu'
'ostadu'
'ostala'
'ostali'
'ostalo'
'ostale'
'ostat'
'ostao'
(<-'osta')
'tasmo'
'taste'
'tajmo'
'tajte'
'tav{sx}i'
'tati'
'tamo'
'tate'
'taju'
'tala'
'talo'
'tale'
'tali'
'tana'
'tano'
'tani'
'tane'
'tan'
'taj'
'tao'
'tam'
'ta{sx}'
'tat'
'tah'
(<-'ta')
'injasmo'
'injaste'
'injati'
'injemo'
'injete'
'injali'
'injala'
'injalo'
'injale'
'inja{sx}e'
'injahu'
'injem'
'inje{sx}'
'injat'
'injah'
'injao'
(<-'inj')
'astemo'
'astete'
'astimo'
'astite'
'astu{cy}i'
'aste{sx}'
'asli'
'asla'
'aslo'
'asle'
(<-'as')
'iv{sx}i'
'ie{cy}i'
'ismo'
'imo'
'ite'
'iti'
'ili'
'ila'
'ilo'
'ile'
'im'
'i{sx}'
'it'
'ih'
'io'
(<-'i')
'ijemo'
'ijete'
'ijem'
'ije{sx}'
'ijmo'
'ijte'
'iju'
'ije'
'ij'
'ilu'
(<-'i')
'lu{cx}ujete'
'lu{cx}uju{cy}i'
'lu{cx}ujemo'
'lu{cx}ujem'
'lu{cx}uje{sx}'
'lu{cx}ismo'
'lu{cx}iste'
'lu{cx}ujmo'
'lu{cx}ujte'
'lu{cx}uje'
'lu{cx}uju'
'lu{cx}i{sx}e'
'lu{cx}iti'
'lu{cx}imo'
'lu{cx}ite'
'lu{cx}ila'
'lu{cx}ilo'
'lu{cx}ili'
'lu{cx}ile'
'lu{cx}ena'
'lu{cx}eno'
'lu{cx}eni'
'lu{cx}ene'
'lu{cx}uj'
'lu{cx}io'
'lu{cx}en'
'lu{cx}im'
'lu{cx}i{sx}'
'lu{cx}it'
'lu{cx}ih'
'lu{cx}e'
'lu{cx}i'
(<-'lu{cx}')
'jetismo'
'jetiste'
'jeti{sx}e'
'jetimo'
'jetite'
'jetiti'
'jetili'
'jetila'
'jetilo'
'jetile'
'jetim'
'jeti{sx}'
'jetit'
'jetih'
'jetio'
(<-'jeti')
'emo'
'em'
'e{sx}'
'elama'
'el'
(<-'e')
'ilama'
'ilima'
'ilom'
'il'
(<-'i')
'atijega'
'atijemu'
'atijima'
'atijeg'
'atijem'
'atega'
'atemu'
'ateg'
'atem'
'atijih'
'atijim'
'atima'
'atoga'
'atome'
'atomu'
'atiji'
'atije'
'atija'
'atiju'
'atoj'
'atog'
'atom'
'atim'
'atih'
'ata'
'atu'
'ato'
(<-'at')
'etav{sx}i'
'etu{cy}i'
'etemo'
'etimo'
'etem'
'ete{sx}'
(<-'et')
'enom'
'enoj'
'enog'
'enim'
'enih'
'anoj'
'anog'
'anim'
'anih'
'eno'
'oga'
'ima'
'enu'
'ena'
'ama'
(<-'')
'om'
'og'
'u'
'o'
'i'
'e'
'a'
(<-'')
'astes'(R2 <-'as')
'acaju'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'osiji'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'esi'(R2 <-'e{sx}')
'snjeg'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'acila'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'etuci'(R2 <-'et')
'lucujmo'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'luceno'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'avsi'(R2 <-'a')
'lucujuci'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'jase'(R2 <-'ja{sx}')
'cinima'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'rosit'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'tasem'(R2 <-'ta{sx}')
'nasem'(R2 <-'na{sx}')
'astanes'(R2 <-'asta')
'avase'(R2 <-'ava')
'avas'(R2 <-'ava')
'is'(R2 <-'i')
'osega'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'ucomu'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'gasem'(R2 <-'ga{sx}')
'evase'(R2 <-'eva')
'lucim'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'gasima'(R2 <-'ga{sx}')
'astuci'(R2 <-'as')
'irajuci'(R2 <-'ir')
'dajima'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'aceno'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'snjijem'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'es'(R2 <-'e')
'osi'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'osijem'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'ucome'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'ecome'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'acega'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'tasa'(R2 <-'ta{sx}')
'kasi'(R2 <-'ka{sx}')
'cinom'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'rosis'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'ecoga'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'istanes'(R2 <-'ista')
'snjijim'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'irujes'(R2 <-'ir')
'ucih'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'rositi'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'ucog'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'luci'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'evas'(R2 <-'eva')
'acoj'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'etavsi'(R2 <-'et')
'cinih'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'acam'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'kasu'(R2 <-'ka{sx}')
'uceg'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'acih'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'snjijoj'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'snjije'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'astajase'(R2 <-'astaj')
'jasi'(R2 <-'ja{sx}')
'ucima'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'rosili'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'acem'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'osemu'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'snjiju'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'acom'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'acena'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'lucuj'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'ostadose'(R2 <-'osta')
'acan'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'acane'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'injase'(R2 <-'inj')
'snjoga'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'jasima'(R2 <-'ja{sx}')
'ivas'(R2 <-'iva')
'istajase'(R2 <-'istaj')
'snjoj'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'lucile'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'lucujes'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'lucismo'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'gasi'(R2 <-'ga{sx}')
'lucujte'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'rosise'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'acimo'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'acen'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'tasima'(R2 <-'ta{sx}')
'ecemu'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'cini'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'rosite'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'lucio'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'snem'(R2 <-'{sx}n')
'lucih'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'aciste'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'nuci'(R2 <-'n')
'injes'(R2 <-'inj')
'acate'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'rosilo'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'osije'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'esem'(R2 <-'e{sx}')
'acao'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'astajes'(R2 <-'astaj')
'rosimo'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'ecih'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'evajuci'(R2 <-'eva')
'nis'(R2 <-'ni')
'acog'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'acile'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'ivajuci'(R2 <-'iva')
'jasa'(R2 <-'ja{sx}')
'acome'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'nasi'(R2 <-'na{sx}')
'ucoj'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'vasom'(R2 <-'va{sx}')
'iravsi'(R2 <-'ir')
'istajuci'(R2 <-'istaj')
'dajama'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'cinu'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'dajevi'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'vasi'(R2 <-'va{sx}')
'kasom'(R2 <-'ka{sx}')
'tase'(R2 <-'ta{sx}')
'acali'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'avajuci'(R2 <-'ava')
'rosio'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'aci'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'lucujem'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'osem'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'kase'(R2 <-'ka{sx}')
'ucoga'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'lucite'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'tasom'(R2 <-'ta{sx}')
'as'(R2 <-'a')
'lucen'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'luce'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'osih'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'snja'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'tasu'(R2 <-'ta{sx}')
'lucujete'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'nes'(R2 <-'n')
'cine'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'luciste'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'basama'(R2 <-'ba{sx}')
'osijemu'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'snjog'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'rosismo'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'snjome'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'gasu'(R2 <-'ga{sx}')
'luceni'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'acomu'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'snjiji'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'snjijemu'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'uca'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'snjijih'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'lucise'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'acit'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'ecima'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'snjo'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'acismo'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'snjega'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'acene'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'uvase'(R2 <-'uva')
'lucila'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'basi'(R2 <-'ba{sx}')
'acani'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'basom'(R2 <-'ba{sx}')
'kasama'(R2 <-'ka{sx}')
'urajuci'(R2 <-'ur')
'acavsi'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'acite'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'cinim'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'snjijeg'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'lucis'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'daji'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'acoga'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'ostajes'(R2 <-'ostaj')
'ijes'(R2 <-'i')
'eca'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'gase'(R2 <-'ga{sx}')
'eceg'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'osijim'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'acis'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'ucom'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'lucimo'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'osa'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'jasem'(R2 <-'ja{sx}')
'lucilo'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'osijih'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'vasu'(R2 <-'va{sx}')
'rosivsi'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'acas'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'acili'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'lucit'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'snje'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'ecoj'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'ujuci'(R2 <-'uj')
'osijega'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'kasima'(R2 <-'ka{sx}')
'astadose'(R2 <-'asta')
'base'(R2 <-'ba{sx}')
'ostanes'(R2 <-'osta')
'ujes'(R2 <-'uj')
'snju'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'nasama'(R2 <-'na{sx}')
'ecem'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'nasu'(R2 <-'na{sx}')
'isama'(R2 <-'i{sx}')
'dajevima'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'sneg'(R2 <-'{sx}n')
'osoga'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'acat'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'nase'(R2 <-'na{sx}')
'lucuje'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'kasem'(R2 <-'ka{sx}')
'ucega'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'uce'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'ecim'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'tavsi'(R2 <-'ta')
'basem'(R2 <-'ba{sx}')
'osom'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'ace'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'jetis'(R2 <-'jeti')
'kasa'(R2 <-'ka{sx}')
'aceci'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'acati'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'tasi'(R2 <-'ta{sx}')
'aceni'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'ecuh'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'snega'(R2 <-'{sx}n')
'lucene'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'ivase'(R2 <-'iva')
